Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-247
Filing of certificate; effect.

The fact that a certificate of limited partnership is on file in the office of the Secretary of State is notice that the partnership is a limited partnership and is notice of all other facts set forth in the certificate which are required to be set forth in a certificate of limited partnership by section 67-240 and subsection (h) of section 67-241, but it is not notice of any other fact.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 15;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 20.